Alaska statutes. Title 22. Judiciary.
Article 6. Public Administrators.

Sec. 22.20.410.
Appointment.

When authorized by the supreme court, the presiding judge in each judicial district shall appoint a person to act as public administrator of the estates of deceased persons.

History.

(§ 1 ch 216 SLA 1970; am § 1 ch 55 SLA 1975; am § 19 ch 83 SLA 1981; am § 12 ch 55 SLA 1984; am § 14 ch 103 SLA 1996)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

22.15.310

. Renumbered in 1998.

Sec. 22.20.420.
Administration of decedents’ estates.

When letters of administration are issued to a public administrator by the superior court in the district, the public administrator is the legal custodian of and shall administer the estates of deceased persons who leave property within the district. Letters of administration shall be issued to the public administrator when (1) administration of a decedent’s estate is required by law, and (2) a period of 30 days has elapsed from the date of death with no letters testamentary or letters of administration having been applied for and issued to any other person entitled by law to administer the estate of the deceased person. Except as otherwise provided in AS

22.20.410

—

22.20.440

, a public administrator shall administer estates as other administrators, and has all the rights and authority, and is subject to all the duties and liabilities of other administrators.

History.

(§ 1 ch 216 SLA 1970; am § 15 ch 103 SLA 1996)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

22.15.320

. Renumbered in 1998, at which time “AS

22.20.410

—

22.20.440

” was substituted for “AS

22.15.310

—

22.15.340

” to reflect the renumbering.

Sec. 22.20.430.
Bond.

Before entering upon the duties of a public administrator, the public administrator shall execute and file with the administrative director of the Alaska Court System a surety bond in the form and amount to be determined by rule of the supreme court. The costs of the bond shall be paid by the court system.

History.

(§ 1 ch 216 SLA 1970; am § 31 ch 8 SLA 2011)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

22.15.330

. Renumbered in 1998.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2011 amendment, effective May 10, 2011, substituted “Alaska Court System” for “court system.”

Sec. 22.20.440.
Compensation.

A public administrator is entitled to annual compensation in an amount to be determined by the supreme court and is not entitled to fees as other administrators.

History.

(§ 1 ch 216 SLA 1970)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

22.15.340

. Renumbered in 1998.